ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > ハンドボール用品 > チームハンドボール練習器具: チームハンドボール用アジリティフープ; チームハンドボール用アジリティラダー・ハードル; チームハンドボール用フィットネス機器; チームハンドボール用ゴールキーパー練習器具; チームハンドボール用グリップレジン; チームハンドボール用パスターゲット; チームハンドボール用リバウンドボード; チームハンドボール用シュートターゲット; チームハンドボール用トレーニングバッグ; チームハンドボール用トレーニングコーン
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Pallamano in squadra > Ausili per l'allenamento della squadra di pallamano: Cerchi per agilità di pallamano a squadre; Scalette e ostacoli per agilità per pallamano; Attrezzature per fitness per pallamano per squadre; Ausili per l'allenamento dei portieri della squadra di pallamano; Resine per presa per pallamano; Obiettivi di passaggio di pallamano a squadre; Tavole da rimbalzo per pallamano a squadre; Bersagli da tiro a squadre di pallamano; Borse da allenamento per squadre di pallamano; Coni da allenamento per pallamano
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Csapatkézilabda > Csapatkézilabda edzési segédeszközök: Csapatkézilabda ügyességi gyűrűk; Kézilabda agility létrák és gátak; Csapatkézilabda-fitneszfelszerelés; Csapatkézilabda-kapusedzéssegédek; Kézilabda tapadásjavító gyanták; Csapatkézilabda-passzcélok; Csapatkézilabda visszapattanó táblák; Csapatkézilabda-lövőcélok; Csapatkézilabda-edzőtáskák; Kézilabda edzőbóják
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Rukomet > Pomagala za rukometni trening: Obruči za agilnost za rukomet; Ljestve i prepone za agilnost za rukomet; Fitness oprema za rukomet; Oprema za rukometnog vratara; Smole za hvat za rukomet; Mete za dodavanje za rukomet; Odbijajuće ploče za rukomet; Mete za gađanje za rukomet; Ruksaci za rukometni trening; Čunjevi za vježbanje za rukomet
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Týmová házená > Tréninkové pomůcky na týmovou házenou: Kruhy na trénink agility pro týmovou házenou; Koordinační žebříky a překážky na házenou; Fitness vybavení pro týmovou házenou; Tréninkové pomůcky pro brankáře týmové házené; Házenkářské vosky; Terče pro trénování přesnosti přihrávek v týmové házené; Odrážecí trenažéry na trénink týmové házené; Střelecké cíle pro týmovou házenou; Tréninkové tašky pro týmovou házenou; Tréninkové kužely na házenou
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 팀 핸드볼 > 팀 핸드볼 훈련 장비: 팀 핸드볼 어질리티 후프; 팀 핸드볼 민첩성 사다리 및 허들; 팀 핸드볼 피트니스 장비; 팀 핸드볼 골기퍼 훈련 장비; 팀 핸드볼 그립 레진; 팀 핸드볼 패싱 타겟; 팀 핸드볼 리바운드 보드; 팀 핸드볼 슈팅 타겟; 팀 핸드볼 트레이닝 가방; 팀 핸드볼 훈련용 콘
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Andebol > Auxiliares de treino para andebol em equipa: Arcos de agilidade para andebol em equipa; Escadas e barreiras de agilidade de andebol; Equipamento de fitness para andebol em equipa; Auxiliares de treino de guarda-redes para andebol em equipa; Resinas de aderência de andebol; Alvos de passe para andebol em equipa; Placas de ressalto para andebol em equipa; Alvos de lançamento para andebol em equipa; Sacos de treino para andebol em equipa; Cones de treino de andebol
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Käsipallo > Käsipallon harjoitteluvälineet: Käsipallon ketteryyskorit; Käsipallon koordinaatiotikkaat ja -aidat; Käsipallon kuntolaitteet; Käsipallon maalivahdin harjoitteluvälineet; Käsipallon pihkat; Käsipallon syöttömaalitaulut; Käsipallon palautuslevyt; Käsipallon maalitaulut; Käsipallon harjoittelusäkit; Käsipallon harjoituskartiot
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Balonmano > Ayudas para el entrenamiento de balonmano en equipo: Aros de agilidad para equipos de balonmano; Escaleras y vallas de agilidad para balonmano; Equipo de gimnasia de balonmano; Ayudas para el entrenamiento del portero del equipo de balonmano; Resinas de agarre para balonmano; Objetivos de pase de balonmano del equipo; Tablas de rebote para equipos de balonmano; Dianas de tiro para equipos de balonmano; Bolsas de entrenamiento para equipos de balonmano; Conos de entrenamiento para balonmano
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Håndball > Treningshjelpemidler for håndball: Agilityringer for håndball; Agilitystiger og hekker for håndball; Treningsutstyr for håndball; Treningshjelpemidler for håndballkeepere; Håndballklister; Pasningsmål for håndball; Reboundbrett for håndball; Skyteskiver for håndball; Treningssekker for håndball; Treningskjegler for håndball
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Tímová hádzaná > Tréningové pomôcky pre tímovú hádzanú: Agility obruče pre tímovú hádzanú; Rebríky a prekážky pre tímovú hádzanú; Fitness vybavenie pre tímovú hádzanú; Hádzanárske tréningové pomôcky pre brankárov; Pryžové úchyty pre hádzanárske lopty; Prihrávkové terče pre tímovú hádzanú; Odrazové dosky pre tímovú hádzanú; Strelecké terče pre tímovú hádzanú; Tréningové tašky na tímovú hádzanú; Tréningové kužele pre tímovú hádzanú
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng ném > Dụng cụ hỗ trợ tập luyện bóng ném: Vòng luyện tập độ nhanh bóng ném; Thang & rào nhảy tập độ linh hoạt bóng ném; Thiết bị thể dục luyện tập bóng ném; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ tập luyện thủ môn bóng ném; Keo tăng độ bám tay bóng ném; Mục tiêu chuyền bóng ném; Ván bật lại luyện tập bóng ném; Mục tiêu ném luyện tập bóng ném; Túi đựng đồ tập luyện bóng ném; Nón tập bóng ném
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Team Handball > Team Handball Training Aids: Team Handball Agility Hoops; Team Handball Agility Ladders & Hurdles; Team Handball Fitness Equipment; Team Handball Goalkeeper Training Aids; Team Handball Grip Resins; Team Handball Passing Targets; Team Handball Rebound Boards; Team Handball Shooting Targets; Team Handball Training Bags; Team Handball Training Cones
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Гандбол > Тренировочный инвентарь для гандбола: Кольца для тренировки скорости и координации; Координационные лестницы и барьеры для гандбола; Инвентарь для фитнес-тренировок для гандбола; Тренировочный инвентарь для гандбольных вратарей; Мастики для гандбола; Мишени для отработки пасов для гандбола; Гандбольные тренажеры-стенки; Мишени для отработки бросков по гандбольным воротам; Сумки для гандбольных тренировок; Тренировочные конусы для гандбола
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > แฮนด์บอลทีม > อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกซ้อมแฮนด์บอลทีม: ห่วงฝึกความคล่องตัวสำหรับแฮนด์บอลทีม; บันไดและรั้วฝึกความคล่องตัวแฮนด์บอล; อุปกรณ์ฟิตเนสสำหรับแฮนด์บอลทีม; อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกซ้อมผู้รักษาประตูแฮนด์บอลทีม; เรซินเพิ่มความหนึบแฮนด์บอล; เป้าหมายการส่งลูกแฮนด์บอลทีม; กระดานเด้งลูกแฮนด์บอลทีม; เป้าหมายการยิงแฮนด์บอลทีม; กระเป๋าฝึกซ้อมแฮนด์บอลทีม; กรวยฝึกแฮนด์บอล
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Χάντμπολ > Βοηθήματα προπόνησης χάντμπολ: Στεφάνια ευκινησίας χάντμπολ; Σκάλες και εμπόδια ευκινησίας χάντμπολ; Εξοπλισμός γυμναστικής χάντμπολ; Βοηθήματα τερματοφυλάκων χάντμπολ; Ρητίνες λαβής χάντμπολ; Στόχοι πάσας χάντμπολ; Πίνακες αναπήδησης για το χάντμπολ; Στόχοι σουτ χάντμπολ; Σάκοι προπόνησης χάντμπολ; Κώνοι προπόνησης χάντμπολ
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Handbal în echipă > Articole antrenament handbal în echipă: Cercuri agilitate pentru handbal în echipă; Scări de agilitate și garduri pentru handbal; Echipament de fitness pentru handbal în echipă; Articole antrenament portar pentru handbal în echipă; Rășini pentru aderență la handbal; Ținte pentru pase pentru handbal în echipă; Plăci ricoșeu pentru handbal în echipă; Ținte pentru aruncări pentru handbal în echipă; Saci de antrenament pentru handbal în echipă; Conuri de antrenament pentru handbal
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Komandinis rankinis > Komandinio rankinio treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės: Komandinio rankinio vikrumo treniruočių lankai; Rankinio vikrumo kopėtėlės ir barjerai; Komandinio rankinio treniruočių įranga; Komandinio rankinio vartininkų treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės; Rankinio sporto rankų sukibimo dervos; Komandinio rankinio perdavimų treniruočių taikiniai; Komandinio rankinio atšokimo lentos; Komandinio rankinio metimų taikiniai; Komandinio rankinio treniruočių krepšiai; Rankinio treniruočių kūgeliai
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Handball > Aides à l’entraînement au handball en équipe: Cerceaux d’agilité de handball en équipe; Échelles d’agilité et haies de handball; Équipement de fitness pour handball en équipe; Aides à l’entraînement des gardiens de but de handball en équipe; Résines de handball; Cibles de passe de handball en équipe; Planches de rebond de handball en équipe; Cibles de tir de handball en équipe; Sacs d’entraînement de handball en équipe; Cônes d’entraînement de handball
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Piłka ręczna > Pomoce treningowe do piłki ręcznej: Obręcze treningowe do piłki ręcznej trening zwinnościowy; Drabinki koordynacyjne i płotki do piłki ręcznej; Sprzęt fitness do piłki ręcznej; Pomoce treningowe dla bramkarzy w piłce ręcznej; Klej do piłki ręcznej; Cele podań do piłki ręcznej; Odbijacze do piłki ręcznej; Tarcze strzeleckie do piłki ręcznej; Torby treningowe do piłki ręcznej; Pachołki treningowe do piłki ręcznej
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 手球 > 手球訓練輔助用具: 手球敏捷訓練圈; 團隊手球敏捷梯與欄架; 手球健身器材; 手球守門員訓練輔助工具; 團隊手球止滑脂; 手球傳球靶; 手球訓練板; 手球射球靶; 手球訓練包; 團隊手球訓練角錐
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Handboll > Träningshjälpmedel för handboll: Snabbhetsövningsringar för handboll; Koordinationsstegar och häckar för handboll; Fitnessutrustning för handboll; Målvaktsträningshjälpmedel för handboll; Klister för handboll; Passningsmåltavlor för handboll; Returskivor för handboll; Skottmåltavlor för handboll; Träningsväskor för handboll; Träningskoner för handboll
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Handebol > Auxílios de treinamento para handebol: Argolas de agilidade para handebol; Escadas e barreiras de agilidade de handebol; Equipamento de ginástica para handebol; Auxílios de treinamento para goleiros de handebol; Resinas para as mãos de handebol; Alvos de passes para handebol; Placas de rebote para handebol; Alvos de tiro para handebol; Bolsas de treinamento para handebol; Cones de treinamento de handebol
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Handball > Handball-Trainingshilfen: Handball-Trainingsbögen; Koordinationsleitern & Hürden für Handball; Handball-Fitnessgeräte; Trainingshilfen für Handball-Torwarte; Handball-Harz; Handball-Passziele; Handball-Rebound-Boards; Handball-Wurfziele; Handball-Trainingstaschen; Handball-Trainingshütchen
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 手球 > 团队手球训练辅助用品: 团队手球敏捷圈; 手球敏捷梯与跨栏; 团队手球健身器材; 团队手球守门员训练辅助用品; 手球防滑松香; 团队手球传球靶; 团队手球反弹板; 团队手球投球靶; 团队手球训练包; 手球训练标志锥
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Ekipni rokomet > Pripomočki za vadbo ekipnega rokometa: Agility obroči za ekipni rokomet; Lestve in ovire za agilnost za rokomet; Fitnes oprema za ekipni rokomet; Pripomočki za vadbo vratarjev ekipnega rokometa; Smole za oprijem za rokomet; Tarče za podajanje v ekipnem rokometu; Odbojne deske za ekipni rokomet; Tarče za ekipni rokomet; Pripomočki za vadbo ekipnega rokometa; Vadbeni stožci za rokomet
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Håndbold > Træningshjælpemidler til håndbold: Agilityringe til håndbold; Agilitystiger og -hække til håndbold; Fitnessudstyr til håndbold; Hjælpemidler til træning af håndboldmålmand; Harpiks til håndbold; Afleveringstræning til håndbold; Bander til håndbold; Skydeskiver til håndbold; Træningstasker til håndbold; Træningskegler til håndbold
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Teamhandbal > Trainingshulpmiddelen voor teamhandbal: Behendigheidshoepels voor teamhandbal; Behendigheidsladders en -horden voor handbal; Fitnessapparaten voor teamhandbal; Keepertrainingshulpmiddelen voor teamhandbal; Handbalhars; Passeerdoelwitten voor teamhandbal; Reboundborden voor teamhandbal; Schietdoelwitten voor teamhandbal; Trainingszakken voor teamhandbal; Handbaltrainingspionnen
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Хандбал > Помощни средства за тренировка по хандбал: Обръчи за ловкост за хандбал; Стълби за ловкост и препятствия за отборен хандбал; Фитнес оборудване за хандбал; Помощни средства за тренировка на вратари по хандбал; Смоли за захват за отборен хандбал; Мишени за подаване за хандбал; Табла за отскок за хандбал; Мишени за стрелба за хандбал; Чанти за тренировка по хандбал; Тренировъчни конуси за отборен хандбал
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Takım Hentbolu > Takım Hentbolu Eğitim Araçları: Takım Hentbolu Çeviklik Çemberleri; Hentbol çeviklik merdivenleri ve engelleri; Takım Hentbolu Fitness Aletleri; Takım Hentbolu Kaleci Eğitim Araçları; Hentbol tutuş reçineleri; Takım Hentbolu Pas Hedefleri; Takım Hentbolu Ribaund Tahtaları; Takım Hentbolu Atış Hedefleri; Takım Hentbolu Antrenman Çantaları; Hentbol antrenman konileri